Tennessee, session 114, HB2266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-213(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(5) The driver's extreme and excessive rate of speed. As used in this
subdivision (a)(5), "extreme and excessive rate of speed" means traveling at more than
twenty (20) miles per hour over the posted speed limit.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-213(b), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) Vehicular homicide under subdivision (a)(5) is a Class B felony.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2266
011977
- 1 -